Utah statutes.
41-6a-305.   Traffic-control signal -- At intersections -- At place other
than intersection -- Color of light signal -- Inoperative traffic-control
signals.
(1) (a)  Green, red, and yellow are the only colors that may be used in a
traffic-control signal, except for a:
(i)  pedestrian traffic-control signal that may use white and orange; and
(ii)  rail vehicle that may use white.
(b)  Traffic-control signals apply to the operator of a vehicle and to a
pedestrian as provided in this section.
(2) (a) (i)  Except as provided in Subsection (2)(a)(ii), the operator of a
vehicle facing a circular green signal may:
(A)  proceed straight through the intersection;
(B)  turn right; or
(C)  turn left.
(ii) The operator of a vehicle facing a circular green signal, including an
operator turning right or left:
(A)  shall yield the right-of-way to other vehicles and to pedestrians
lawfully within the intersection or an adjacent crosswalk at the time the
signal is exhibited; and
(B)  may not turn right or left if a sign at the intersection prohibits the
turn.
(b)  The operator of a vehicle facing a green arrow signal shown alone or in
combination with another indication:
(i)  may cautiously enter the intersection only to make the movement indicated
by the arrow or other indication shown at the same time; and
(ii)  shall yield the right-of-way to pedestrians lawfully within an adjacent
crosswalk and to other traffic lawfully using the intersection.
(c)  Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian traffic-control signal under
Section 41-6a-306, a pedestrian facing any green signal other than a green
turn arrow may proceed across the roadway within any marked or unmarked
crosswalk.
(3) (a)  The operator of a vehicle facing a steady circular yellow or yellow
arrow signal is warned that the allowable movement related to a green signal
is being terminated.
(b)  Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian traffic-control signal under
Section 41-6a-306, a pedestrian facing a steady circular yellow or yellow
arrow signal is advised that there is insufficient time to cross the roadway
before a red indication is shown, and a pedestrian may not start to cross the
roadway.
(4) (a)  Except as provided in Subsection (4)(c), the operator of a vehicle
facing a steady circular red or red arrow signal:
(i)  may not enter the intersection unless entering the intersection to make a
movement is permitted by another indication; and
(ii)  shall stop at a clearly marked stop line, but if none, before entering
the marked or unmarked crosswalk on the near side of the intersection and
shall remain stopped until an indication to proceed is shown.
(b)  Unless otherwise directed by a pedestrian traffic-control signal under
Section 41-6a-306, a pedestrian facing a steady red signal alone may not enter
the roadway.
(c) (i)  Except when facing a red arrow signal or when a sign is in place
prohibiting a turn, the operator of a vehicle facing any steady circular red
signal may cautiously enter the intersection to turn right, or may turn left
from a one-way street into a one-way street, after stopping as required by
Subsection (4)(a).
(ii)  The operator of a vehicle shall yield the right-of-way to:
(A) another vehicle moving through the intersection in accordance with an
official traffic-control signal; and
(B) a pedestrian lawfully within an adjacent crosswalk.
(5) (a)  This section applies to a highway or rail line where a traffic-
control signal is erected and maintained.
(b)  Any stop required shall be made at a sign or marking on the highway
pavement indicating where the stop shall be made, but, in the absence of any
sign or marking, the stop shall be made at the signal.
(6)  The operator of a vehicle approaching an intersection that has an
inoperative traffic-control signal shall:
(a)  stop before entering the intersection; and
(b)  yield the right-of-way to any vehicle as required under Section
41-6a-901.
